Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-308.01
Rules and regulations; appropriate hunting weapons.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the appropriate weapons which may be used for hunting wildlife. The rules and regulations shall take effect beginning January 1, 2004.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 28.